Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-911
Surrender of license; effect.

A licensee may surrender a delayed deposit services business license by delivering to the director written notice that the license is surrendered and any processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 45-905.01. The department may issue a notice of cancellation of the license following such surrender in lieu of revocation proceedings. The surrender shall not affect the licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior to such surrender, affect the liability for any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of its officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or members for acts committed before the surrender, affect the liability of the surety on the bond, or entitle such licensee to a return of any part of the annual license fee or fees. The director may establish procedures for the disposition of the books, accounts, and records of the licensee and may require such action as he or she deems necessary for the protection of the makers of checks which are outstanding at the time of surrender of the license.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 39;

Laws 2018, LB194, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 41.